src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Mundurukú language are attatched to the left of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
verbprefix-     Verbs   ;

!Gomes 2006: 20
!:%{ow%}%< Nouns ;!
!:%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!
!:j%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!DeVoice/y/i/ce
!:j%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!coref
!:oc%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!
!:wuy%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!
!:ey%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!
!:j%{eØ%}%< Nouns ;!

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
