src/fst/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Mundurukú language are attatched to the left of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
verbprefix-     Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
